Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-1118
Violations; penalty.

Any person who violates any provision of the Burial Pre-Need Sale Act or who makes a report required under such act which is false or fraudulent shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor and his or her license shall be revoked.

Laws 1986, LB 643, § 18.